Colorado, session 2026A, SB089.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, recreate and
reenact, with amendments, part 16 of article 3 of title 2 as follows:
PART 16
WILDFIRE MATTERS REVIEW COMMITTEE
2-3-1601. Legislative declaration.
-2- SB26-089

(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:
(a) WILDFIRES ARE PART OF THE NATURAL CYCLE OF COLORADO'S
FORESTS, YET INCREASINGLY POSE A SEVERE THREAT TO HUMAN LIFE AND
PROPERTY;
(b) PEOPLE ARE ATTRACTED TO THE FOREST AND MOUNTAIN AREAS
OF THE STATE AND INCREASINGLY CHOOSE TO MAKE THEIR HOMES IN
WHAT IS KNOWN AS THE "WILDLAND-URBAN INTERFACE", WHERE
WILDLAND AREAS MEET RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT;
(c) THESE AND OTHER RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENTS LOCATED IN
NUMEROUS PARTS OF THE STATE ARE REGULARLY THREATENED BY CLOSE
PROXIMITY TO WILDFIRES AND, TRAGICALLY, DURING THE WINTER OF 2021
AND THE SPRING AND SUMMER OF 2012, COLORADO WILDFIRES RESULTED
IN THE LOSS OF LIFE AND EXTENSIVE PROPERTY DAMAGE, INCLUDING THE
DESTRUCTION OF HOMES, AFFECTING THOUSANDS OF PEOPLE; AND
(d) SINCE WILDFIRES CAUSE ANNUAL HARM TO MANY AREAS OF
THE STATE AND THE RESIDENTS OF THOSE AREAS, WILDFIRE PREVENTION
AND MITIGATION IS A MATTER OF EXTREME AND STATEWIDE IMPORTANCE
THAT DEMANDS CRITICAL ATTENTION FROM THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON
A REGULAR BASIS.
(2) ACCORDINGLY, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THE
RECREATION OF THE WILDFIRE MATTERS REVIEW COMMITTEE IS CRITICAL
TO CONTINUE TO PROVIDE A PUBLIC FORUM FOR LEGISLATIVE SCRUTINY OF
STATE POLICIES AND RESOURCES ADDRESSING WILDFIRE PREVENTION AND
MITIGATION WITH PUBLIC PARTICIPATION.
2-3-1602. Wildfire matters review committee - creation -
membership - duties - repeal.
(1) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 2-3-303.3, THE WILDFIRE
-3- SB26-089

MATTERS REVIEW COMMITTEE IS CREATED.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMITTEE IS TO REVIEW THE
IMPLEMENTATION AND EFFECTIVENESS OF STATE POLICIES AND RESOURCES
FOR WILDFIRE PREVENTION AND MITIGATION AND TO RECOMMEND
LEGISLATION OR OTHER POLICY CHANGES TO ADDRESS ALL MATTERS
RELATED TO WILDFIRE PREVENTION AND MITIGATION INCLUDING PUBLIC
SAFETY, FOREST HEALTH, AND COOPERATION WITH APPROPRIATE FEDERAL
AGENCIES AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTS.
(3) (a) THE COMMITTEE CONSISTS OF TEN MEMBERS OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY APPOINTED AS FOLLOWS:
(I) FIVE MEMBERS OF THE SENATE, THREE MEMBERS APPOINTED BY
THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE AND TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE
MINORITY LEADER OF THE SENATE; AND
(II) FIVE MEMBERS OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, THREE
MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES AND TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE MINORITY
LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.
(b) THE APPOINTING AUTHORITIES SHALL MAKE THEIR INITIAL
APPOINTMENTS TO THE COMMITTEE NO LATER THAN JUNE 1, 2026.
(c) THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE SHALL APPOINT THE CHAIR OF
THE COMMITTEE IN EVEN-NUMBERED YEARS AND THE VICE-CHAIR OF THE
COMMITTEE IN ODD-NUMBERED YEARS. THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES SHALL APPOINT THE CHAIR OF THE COMMITTEE IN
ODD-NUMBERED YEARS AND THE VICE-CHAIR OF THE COMMITTEE IN
EVEN-NUMBERED YEARS.
(4) EACH MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE SERVES AT THE PLEASURE
OF THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY AND CONTINUES UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS
-4- SB26-089

APPOINTED. THE TERM OF APPOINTMENT IS TWO YEARS. THE TERM OF
EACH MEMBER TERMINATES ON THE CONVENING DAY OF THE FIRST
REGULAR SESSION OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY NEXT FOLLOWING THEIR
APPOINTMENT OR REAPPOINTMENT TO THE COMMITTEE; EXCEPT THAT THE
TERM OF EACH MEMBER APPOINTED INITIALLY PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(3)(b) OF THIS SECTION TERMINATES ON THE CONVENING DATE OF THE
FIRST REGULAR SESSION OF THE SEVENTY-SIXTH GENERAL ASSEMBLY. THE
APPOINTING AUTHORITIES SHALL MAKE ALL NECESSARY APPOINTMENTS
SUBSEQUENT TO TERMINATION AS SET FORTH IN THIS SUBSECTION (4) AS
SOON AS PRACTICABLE AFTER THE RELEVANT CONVENING DATE.
INCUMBENT MEMBERS OF THE COMMITTEE MAY BE REAPPOINTED WITHOUT
LIMITATION.
(5) MEMBERS OF THE COMMITTEE SERVE WITHOUT
COMPENSATION; EXCEPT THAT EACH MEMBER IS ENTITLED TO
REIMBURSEMENT FOR ACTUAL AND NECESSARY EXPENSES IN CONNECTION
WITH THE PERFORMANCE OF THE MEMBER'S DUTIES AND RECEIVES THE
SAME PER DIEM AS OTHER MEMBERS OF INTERIM COMMITTEES IN
ATTENDANCE AT MEETINGS.
(6) (a) THE COMMITTEE SHALL MEET AT LEAST TWICE AND MAY
TAKE UP TO TWO FIELD TRIPS EVERY INTERIM. THE CHAIR MAY CALL SUCH
ADDITIONAL MEETINGS AS ARE NECESSARY FOR THE COMMITTEE TO
COMPLETE ITS DUTIES.
(b) THE CHAIR OF THE COMMITTEE SHALL SCHEDULE THE FIRST
MEETING OF THE COMMITTEE NO LATER THAN JULY 31 OF EACH YEAR.
(7) THE COMMITTEE MAY RECOMMEND UP TO FIVE BILLS DURING
EACH INTERIM. LEGISLATION RECOMMENDED BY THE COMMITTEE MUST BE
TREATED AS LEGISLATION RECOMMENDED BY AN INTERIM COMMITTEE FOR
-5- SB26-089

PURPOSES OF APPLICABLE DEADLINES, BILL INTRODUCTION LIMITS, AND
ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS IMPOSED BY THE JOINT RULES OF THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY.
(8) THE COMMITTEE SHALL:
(a) REVIEW THE IMPLEMENTATION AND EFFECTIVENESS OF STATE
POLICIES AND RESOURCES FOR WILDFIRE PREVENTION AND MITIGATION;
(b) SEEK PRESENTATIONS AND COMMENTS FROM INDIVIDUALS
WITH PROFESSIONAL EXPERTISE RELATING TO WILDFIRE PREVENTION AND
MITIGATION, AND FROM REPRESENTATIVES OF RELEVANT STATE AGENCIES,
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS, PRIVATE INDUSTRY, AND IMPACTED COMMUNITIES;
AND
(c) RECOMMEND LEGISLATION OR OTHER POLICY CHANGES TO
ADDRESS MATTERS RELATED TO WILDFIRE PREVENTION AND MITIGATION
INCLUDING PUBLIC SAFETY, FOREST HEALTH, AND COOPERATION WITH
APPROPRIATE FEDERAL AGENCIES AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTS.
(9) THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL AND THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE
LEGAL SERVICES SHALL PROVIDE STAFF ASSISTANCE TO THE COMMITTEE.
(10) THIS PART 16 IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2031.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-6- SB26-089